Utah statutes.
49-21-301.   Contributions to fund program -- Adjustment of premium rate.

(1)  During each legislative session, the board shall certify to the Legislature the employer paid premium rate expressed as a percentage of salary which is required to fund the Public Employees' Long-Term Disability Trust Fund.

(2)  Upon the board's recommendation, the Legislature shall adjust the premium rate to maintain adequate funding for the Public Employees' Long-Term Disability Trust Fund.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 250, 2002 General Session

